Utah statutes.
41-1a-225.   Foreign vehicle compliance with federal law -- English translation -- Temporary permit.

(1)  Before a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of less than 6,000 pounds that was not originally manufactured for sale in the United States may be registered in this state, the applicant shall provide at the time of registration, a signed statement certifying that the vehicle complies with all federal laws and regulations applicable to the vehicle.

(2)  If the certificate of title, manufacturer's certificate of origin, or other document purported to evidence ownership is not printed in the English language, the applicant shall obtain a certified translation of that document in the English language and provide it to the division at the time of registration.

(3)  The division may issue the applicant a temporary permit, not to exceed 120 days, as provided in Section 41-1a-211, pending compliance with federal emission and safety standards.



Amended by Chapter 217, 1999 General Session

